Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.421

Grain indemnity fund program—Initial assessment—Effect on preceding security—New applicants for warehouse or grain dealer licenses.

(1) The department shall establish the initial assessment within sixty days of the activation of the grain indemnity fund program pursuant to RCW 22.09.405. Immediately upon promulgation of the rule, the department shall issue notice to each licensed warehouse and grain dealer of the assessment owed. The initial assessment and assessments issued thereafter shall be paid within thirty days of the date posted on the assessment notice.

(2) The surety bond or other security posted by a licensed warehouse or grain dealer in effect immediately preceding the effective date of the grain indemnity fund program, shall remain in full force and effect and shall not be released until thirty days after the initial assessment is paid. A certificate of deposit or other security in effect immediately preceding the effective date of the grain indemnity fund program shall remain on deposit until the initial assessment is paid and until such certificate of deposit or other security is released by the department following a prompt determination that no outstanding claims are pending against the security.

(3) Each new applicant for a warehouse or grain dealer license shall pay the assessment imposed pursuant to RCW 22.09.416 at the time of application. No license to operate as a grain dealer or grain warehouse or both shall be issued until such assessment is paid.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 22.09.416(2), new applicants shall pay annual assessments into the grain indemnity fund for an equivalent number of years as those participating at the inception of the grain indemnity fund program and who continue to participate in the grain indemnity fund program.

[ 1987 c 509 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.